incubator/apertium-ell-eng/apertium-ell-eng.ell.dix
    <pardef n="αποπο/ίηση__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ίηση</l><r>ίηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίηση</l><r>ίηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίησης</l><r>ίηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιήσεως</l><r>ίηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίηση</l><r>ίηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιήσεις</l><r>ίηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιήσεις</l><r>ίηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιήσεων</l><r>ίηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιήσεις</l><r>ίηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="γ/όνδολα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>όνδολα</l><r>όνδολα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνδολα</l><r>όνδολα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνδολας</l><r>όνδολα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνδολα</l><r>όνδολα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνδολες</l><r>όνδολα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνδολες</l><r>όνδολα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονδολών</l><r>όνδολα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνδολες</l><r>όνδολα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κ/άδμιο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>άδμιο</l><r>άδμιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άδμιο</l><r>άδμιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αδμίου</l><r>άδμιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άδμιο</l><r>άδμιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="νετρ/όνιο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>όνιο</l><r>όνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνιο</l><r>όνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονίου</l><r>όνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνιο</l><r>όνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνια</l><r>όνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνια</l><r>όνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονίων</l><r>όνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνια</l><r>όνιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/άθροισμα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>άθροισμα</l><r>άθροισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άθροισμα</l><r>άθροισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αθροίσματος</l><r>άθροισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άθροισμα</l><r>άθροισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αθροίσματα</l><r>άθροισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αθροίσματα</l><r>άθροισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αθροισμάτων</l><r>άθροισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αθροίσματα</l><r>άθροισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="επ/ίπεδο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ίπεδο</l><r>ίπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίπεδο</l><r>ίπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιπέδου</l><r>ίπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίπεδο</l><r>ίπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίπεδα</l><r>ίπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίπεδα</l><r>ίπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιπέδων</l><r>ίπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίπεδα</l><r>ίπεδο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="χ/ώρισμα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ώρισμα</l><r>ώρισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώρισμα</l><r>ώρισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ωρίσματος</l><r>ώρισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώρισμα</l><r>ώρισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ωρίσματα</l><r>ώρισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ωρίσματα</l><r>ώρισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ωρισμάτων</l><r>ώρισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ωρίσματα</l><r>ώρισμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/έμβασμα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>έμβασμα</l><r>έμβασμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έμβασμα</l><r>έμβασμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εμβάσματος</l><r>έμβασμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έμβασμα</l><r>έμβασμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εμβάσματα</l><r>έμβασμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εμβάσματα</l><r>έμβασμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εμβασμάτων</l><r>έμβασμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εμβάσματα</l><r>έμβασμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/έλατο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>έλατο</l><r>έλατο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έλατο</l><r>έλατο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ελάτου</l><r>έλατο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έλατο</l><r>έλατο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έλατα</l><r>έλατο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έλατα</l><r>έλατο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ελάτων</l><r>έλατο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έλατα</l><r>έλατο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="άθροισμα"><i></i><par n="/άθροισμα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="έλατο"><i></i><par n="/έλατο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="έμβασμα"><i></i><par n="/έμβασμα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αποποίηση"><i>αποπο</i><par n="αποπο/ίηση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="γόνδολα"><i>γ</i><par n="γ/όνδολα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="διαφοροποίηση"><i>διαφοροπο</i><par n="αποπο/ίηση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="επίπεδο"><i>επ</i><par n="επ/ίπεδο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κάδμιο"><i>κ</i><par n="κ/άδμιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="νετρόνιο"><i>νετρ</i><par n="νετρ/όνιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="πρωτόνιο"><i>πρωτ</i><par n="νετρ/όνιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="χώρισμα"><i>χ</i><par n="χ/ώρισμα__n_nt"/></e>
